Colorado, session 2026A, HB1133.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The "Traveling Animal Protection Act", section 33-1-126,
Colorado Revised Statutes, prohibits certain uses of specific animals but
does not prohibit the use of livestock or equine in any way; and
(b) Nothing in this act prohibits the transportation of livestock or
equine within, into, or out of the state.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-1-126, amend
(2)(b)(II); and add (2)(c.5) as follows:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

33-1-126. Prohibiting certain animals in a traveling animal act
- short title - definitions.
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(b) "Environmental education program" means an animal exhibition
that:
(II) Is conducted by an individual A PROFESSIONAL qualified to
impart such information; and
(c.5) "PROFESSIONAL" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL OR AN ORGANIZATION
THAT HAS OBTAINED A PROFESSIONAL ACCREDITATION OR CERTIFICATION
FROM AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE ASSOCIATION OF ZOOS AND AQUARIUMS;
(II) THE GLOBAL FEDERATION OF ANIMAL SANCTUARIES; OR
(III) THE AMERICAN SANCTUARY ASSOCIATION.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1133

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1133